numerals.lexd
PATTERN 11-19
Ten[comp_a] One-Nine[a]
Ten[comp_e] One-Nine[e]

PATTERN EvenTens
Twenty[20]
Forty[40]
One-Nine[3]Twenty[20]
One-Nine[4]Twenty[20]

PATTERN 20-99
EvenTens > Coordinate (One-Nine|11-19)

PATTERN 100-999
One-Nine[counter] < Hundred > Coordinate (One-Nine|Ten[10]|11-19|20-99)

PATTERN 1000-999999
(One-Nine|11-19|20-99|100-999) < Thousand > Coordinate (One-Nine|11-19|20-99|100-999)

PATTERNS
One-Nine				#1-9
Ten[10]					#10
11-19					#11-19
20-99					#20-99
100-999					#100-999
1000-999999				#1000-999999
 

LEXICON One-Nine[counter]
са:са<num>[1,a,-counter]	#1
Iуд:Iуд<num>[2,a]		#2
хьибуд:хьибуд<num>[3,e]		#3
якьуд:якьуд<num>[4,e]		#4
гIифуд:гIифуд<num>[5,a]		#5
ерхьид:ерхьид<num>[6,e]		#6
ерид:ерид<num>[7,e]		#7
муяд:муяд<num>[8,a]		#8
ерчIуд:ерчIуд<num>[9,e]		#9

LEXICON Ten
йицIуд:йицIуд<num>[10]		#10
цIa:йицIуд<num>[comp_a]		#10
цIе:йицIуд<num>[comp_e]		#10

LEXICON Twenty
къад:къад<num>[20]		#20
къа:къад<num>[comp]		#20

LEXICON Forty
ягъцIур:ягъцIур<num>[40]	#40

LEXICON Hundred
верш:верш<num>[100]		#100

LEXICON Thousand
агъзур:агъзур<num>[1000]	#1000

LEXICON Coordinate
на:на<coord>
